Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.250

Commission member's compensation.

The commission members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, plus travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 when they are in session by their call or by the director, or when otherwise engaged in the business of the commission.

[ 2000 c 249 s 5.]